Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1439
Political merchandise, defined.

Political merchandise shall mean goods such as bumper stickers, pins, hats, beverages, literature, or other items sold by a person at a fundraiser or to the general public for publicity or for the purpose of raising funds to be used in supporting or opposing a candidate for nomination for or election to an elective office or in supporting or opposing the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 39.